Hawaii statutes.
§40-11 Destruction of warrants, bonds and
interest coupons. The director of finance and comptroller may destroy all
warrants of the State which have been paid and bear any date three years prior
to the date of destruction; provided that the warrants have been copied to an
unalterable media or electronic storage form and the copies of the warrants are
maintained for ten years from the date of the warrant. Otherwise, state
warrants which have been paid cannot be destroyed until ten years from the date
of the warrant. The director of finance and comptroller may destroy state
bonds and interest coupons which have been paid and bear any date two years
prior to the date of destruction. The director of finance and comptroller may
appoint the fiscal agent for the bond issue to supervise and conduct the
destruction of state bonds and interest coupons which have been paid and bear
any date two years prior to the date of destruction. The fiscal agent so
appointed shall submit reports as required by the director of finance and
comptroller. State warrants, bonds, and interest coupons may be destroyed by
burning, machine shredding, chemical disintegration, or any other method of
disposal deemed acceptable to the director of finance and comptroller. [L 1947,
c 147, §1; RL 1955, §34-54; am L 1957, c 152, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am
L 1961, c 38, §1; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §40-11; am L 1972, c 5, §1; am L
1985, c 217, §1; am L 1998, c 54, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next